Maryland, session 2026, HB0514.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
6–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) (1) “Charitable organization” means:
(i) a person that:
1. A. is or holds itself out to be a benevolent, educational,
eleemosynary, humane, patriotic, philanthropic, or religious organization; OR
B. IS RECOGNIZED BY THE INTERNAL REVENUE
SERVICE AS AUTHORIZED TO RECEIVE DONATIONS THAT ARE DEDUCTIBLE FROM
FEDERAL INCOME TAX UNDER § 170 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE; and
2. solicits or receives charitable contributions from the
public; or
(ii) an ambulance, fire fighting, fraternal, rescue, or police or other
law enforcement organization when it solicits charitable contributions from the public.
(2) “Charitable organization” includes an area, branch, chapter, office, or
similar affiliate that solicits charitable contributions from the public within the State for a

HOUSE BILL 514 3
charitable organization that is organized or has its principal place of business outside the
State.
(3) “Charitable organization” does not include:
(i) an agency of the State government or of a political subdivision;
or
(ii) a political club, committee, or party.
6–205.
(a) (1) The Secretary of State or the Attorney General may investigate an
alleged violation of this title.
(2) (i) In the course of any examination, investigation, or hearing, the
Secretary of State or the Attorney General may subpoena witnesses, administer oaths,
examine an individual under oath, serve written interrogatories, and compel production of
records, books, papers, and other documents.
(ii) Information obtained under this subsection is not admissible in
a subsequent criminal proceeding against the person who provided the information.
(b) If the Secretary of State or the Attorney General finds or has reasonable
grounds to believe that a charitable organization, charitable representative, or public safety
solicitor has violated this title, the Secretary of State or the Attorney General may take one
or more of the following actions:
(1) by mediation with the apparent violators and any representatives they
may choose to assist them, enter into a written assurance of discontinuance, written
assurance of voluntary compliance, or other settlement agreement with the apparent
violators, in accordance with subsection (c) of this section;
(2) summarily issue a cease and desist order to the violator, if the Secretary
of State or the Attorney General:
(i) finds that:
1. § 6–623 OF THIS TITLE HAS BEEN VIOLATED; OR
2. ANY OTHER PROVISION OF this title has been violated
and that the public health, safety, or welfare requires emergency action; and
(ii) gives the violator written notice of the order, the reasons for the
order, and the right of the violator to request a hearing under subsection (g) of this section;
or

HOUSE BILL 514
(3) EXCEPT IN THE ENFORCEMENT OF § 6–623 OF THIS TITLE, refer the
matter to the appropriate State’s Attorney for prosecution.
(c) A settlement agreement under subsection (b)(1) of this section may include
one or more of the following stipulations or conditions:
(1) payment by the apparent violator of the cost of the investigation;
(2) payment by the apparent violator of civil penalties a court could order
OR THE SECRETARY OF STATE OR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL COULD ASSESS under
this title;
(3) payment by the apparent violator of refunds to donors a court could
order under this title;
(4) payment by the apparent violator of contributions received to charitable
or public safety beneficiaries or for charitable or public safety purposes consistent with the
beneficiaries named or purposes represented in the charitable or public safety solicitations
which generated the contributions; or
(5) any other stipulation, condition, or remedy that will correct a violation
of this title.
(d) An agreement under this section is for conciliation purposes only and does not
constitute an admission by any party that the law has been violated.
(e) (1) It is a violation of this title to fail to adhere to any provision contained
in a settlement agreement.
(2) A failure of the Secretary of State or the Attorney General to enforce a
violation of any provision of a settlement agreement does not constitute a waiver of that or
any other provision, or of any right of the Secretary of State or the Attorney General.
(f) The Attorney General may sue in the circuit court for the county in which the
alleged violation occurred for an order that:
(1) restrains further violation of this title;
(2) restrains the defendant from making further charitable or public safety
solicitations in the State;
(3) except as provided under § 6–5A–11 of this title, recovers for the State
a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 for each willful violation of this title;
(4) except as provided under § 6–5A–11 of this title, recovers for the State
a civil penalty not to exceed $3,000 for each grossly negligent violation of this title;

HOUSE BILL 514 5
(5) enforces compliance with this title; or
(6) secures any other appropriate relief, including:
(i) refunds to donors; and
(ii) payment of the charitable or public safety contributions received
by the solicitor to charitable or public safety purposes or beneficiaries consistent with the
purposes represented or beneficiaries named in the charitable or public safety solicitations
which generated the contributions.
(g) (1) If the Secretary of State or the Attorney General issues a cease and
desist order to a person, the person may request a hearing from the Secretary of State.
(2) Within 30 days after a request is submitted, the Secretary of State shall
hold a hearing in accordance with Title 10, Subtitle 2 of the State Government Article.
6–402.
(a) A registration statement shall be on the form that the Secretary of State
provides.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the registration statement
shall contain or be accompanied by:
(9) (i) a certification that all taxes due from the applicant to the State
or to Baltimore City or a county of the State for the preceding fiscal year have been paid,
and all taxes the applicant was required to collect and pay over to the State or to Baltimore
City or a county of the State for the preceding fiscal year have been collected and paid over;
or
(ii) a certification that the taxes due from the applicant to the State
or to Baltimore City or a county are under dispute and the dispute has not been finally
resolved; [and]
(10) A STATEMENT INDICATING THAT THE CHARITABLE
ORGANIZATION DOES NOT AND WILL NOT PARTICIPATE IN OR INTERVENE IN,
INCLUDING THROUGH THE PUBLICATION OR DISTRIBUTION OF STATEMENTS, A
POLITICAL CAMPAIGN ON BEHALF OF OR IN OPPOSITION TO A CANDIDATE FOR
PUBLIC OFFICE; AND
[(10)] (11) any other information that the Secretary of State requires by
regulation.
6–623.

HOUSE BILL 514
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “DIRECTOR” MEANS THE DIRECTOR OF THE STATE
DEPARTMENT OF ASSESSMENTS AND TAXATION.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO EACH CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION THAT:
(1) IS INCORPORATED OR OTHERWISE ESTABLISHED UNDER STATE
LAW OR THE LAWS OF ANOTHER STATE;
(2) IS AUTHORIZED TO RECEIVE DONATIONS THAT ARE DEDUCTIBLE
FROM FEDERAL INCOME TAX UNDER § 170 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE; AND
(3) (I) IS REQUIRED TO REGISTER WITH THE SECRETARY OF
STATE UNDER SUBTITLE 4 OF THIS TITLE; OR
(II) IF EXEMPT FROM THE REGISTRATION REQUIREMENT,
CONDUCTS BUSINESS OR OTHER ACTIVITIES IN THE STATE.
(C) (1) A CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION MAY NOT PARTICIPATE IN OR
INTERVENE IN A POLITICAL CAMPAIGN ON BEHALF OF OR IN OPPOSITION TO A
CANDIDATE FOR PUBLIC OFFICE, INCLUDING THROUGH PUBLICATION OF OR
DISTRIBUTION OF STATEMENTS.
(2) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE INTERPRETED
AND APPLIED IN THE SAME MANNER AS THE PROHIBITION ON POLITICAL CAMPAIGN
ACTIVITY UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE WAS INTERPRETED
AND APPLIED BY THE INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE AS OF JANUARY 19, 2025.
(D) (1) TO ENFORCE THIS SECTION, IN ADDITION TO THE AUTHORITY
PROVIDED UNDER § 6–205 OF THIS TITLE AND SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE SECRETARY OF STATE OR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
MAY:
(I) ASSESS CIVIL PENALTIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION; OR
(II) ORDER A REVOCATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION
(F) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) (I) 1. IF THE SECRETARY OF STATE OR THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL FINDS OR HAS REASONABLE GROUNDS TO BELIEVE THAT A CHARITABLE
ORGANIZATION HAS VIOLATED THIS SECTION, THE SECRETARY OF STATE OR THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE CHARITABLE
ORGANIZATION.

HOUSE BILL 514 7
2. SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, ISSUANCE OF A CEASE AND DESIST ORDER UNDER § 6–205 OF THIS
TITLE FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS A VALID FORM OF NOTICE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBPARAGRAPH.
(II) NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL
INCLUDE A DESCRIPTION OF:
1. THE VIOLATION;
2. ANY OFFER FOR MEDIATION AS PROVIDED IN §
6–205(B)(1) OF THIS TITLE;
3. ANY CIVIL PENALTY ASSESSED UNDER SUBSECTION
(E) OF THIS SECTION;
4. ANY REVOCATION OF A TAX–EXEMPT STATUS UNDER
SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION;
5. THE PENALTY AVOIDANCE PROCESS DESCRIBED IN
PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
6. THE APPEAL RIGHTS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION
(G) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, IF A
CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION RECEIVES NOTICE FOR VIOLATING THIS SECTION, THE
CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION MAY AVOID THE VIOLATION AND IMPOSITION OF A
PENALTY UNDER THIS SECTION IF THE CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION:
1. CAN SHOW THE CONDUCT GIVING RISE TO THE
VIOLATION WAS NOT APPROVED OR AUTHORIZED BY THE CHIEF EXECUTIVE OR
GOVERNING BODY OF THE CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION; AND
2. PUBLICLY AND EFFECTIVELY DISCLAIMS THE
CONDUCT GIVING RISE TO THE VIOLATION NOT LATER THAN 7 DAYS AFTER
RECEIVING NOTICE OF THE VIOLATION.
(II) FOR PURPOSES OF SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, NOTICE OCCURS ON THE EARLIER DATE OF WHEN THE CHARITABLE
ORGANIZATION:

HOUSE BILL 514
1. HAS ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE OR REASONABLY SHOULD
HAVE KNOWN THAT THE CONDUCT GIVING RISE TO THE VIOLATION HAS OCCURRED
AND IS REASONABLY LIKELY TO BE IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION; OR
2. RECEIVES NOTICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(E) (1) A CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION THAT VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS
SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 FOR EACH VIOLATION, IN
ADDITION TO ANY OTHER PENALTIES UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) EACH CONSECUTIVE 5–DAY PERIOD THAT A VIOLATION
CONTINUES IS A SEPARATE VIOLATION.
(3) EACH CIVIL PENALTY ASSESSED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
BE PAID TO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(F) (1) IF THE SECRETARY OF STATE AND THE ATTORNEY GENERAL,
ACTING JOINTLY, FIND OR HAVE REASONABLE GROUNDS TO BELIEVE THAT A
CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION HAS WILLFULLY VIOLATED THIS SECTION, THE
SECRETARY OF STATE AND THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY ORDER A REVOCATION
OF A TAX–EXEMPT STATUS DESCRIBED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3)(I) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(2) IF A CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION FAILS TO TIMELY REQUEST AN
APPEAL OF A REVOCATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (G)(2) OF THIS
SECTION OR IF AN APPEAL OF THE REVOCATION IS HEARD AND DENIED, THE
SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL PROMPTLY PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE
CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION, THE COMPTROLLER, AND THE DIRECTOR.
(3) (I) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING WRITTEN NOTICE FROM
THE SECRETARY OF STATE UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
COMPTROLLER AND THE DIRECTOR SHALL REVOKE FROM THE CHARITABLE
ORGANIZATION, AS APPLICABLE:
1. AN INCOME TAX EXEMPTION THAT HAS BEEN
GRANTED UNDER § 10–104 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE;
2. A SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION CERTIFICATE THAT
HAS BEEN ISSUED UNDER § 11–204 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE; AND
3. A PROPERTY TAX EXEMPTION THAT HAS BEEN
GRANTED UNDER § 7–202 OR § 7–204 OF THE TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 514 9
(II) THE COMPTROLLER AND THE DIRECTOR SHALL PROMPTLY
PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION OF THE
REVOCATION OF ANY TAX–EXEMPT STATUS AND ANY APPEAL RIGHTS AS MAY BE
AVAILABLE.
(4) (I) A REVOCATION UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL REMAIN IN
EFFECT FOR 2 YEARS FROM THE DATE THE REVOCATION BECOMES EFFECTIVE.
(II) AFTER THE 2–YEAR REVOCATION PERIOD ELAPSES, THE
CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION MAY REAPPLY TO THE COMPTROLLER OR THE
DIRECTOR FOR ANY TAX–EXEMPT STATUS THAT WAS AFFECTED BY THE
REVOCATION.
(G) A CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION THAT RECEIVES NOTICE OF A VIOLATION
UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL:
(1) WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF A NOTICE THAT OFFERS
MEDIATION, ACCEPT THE OFFER FOR MEDIATION BY RESPONDING TO THE
SECRETARY OF STATE; OR
(2) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF A NOTICE THAT ASSESSES A
CIVIL PENALTY OR REVOKES A TAX–EXEMPT STATUS UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) PAY THE AMOUNT OF EACH CIVIL PENALTY ASSESSED; OR
(II) REQUEST A HEARING WITH THE SECRETARY OF STATE TO
BE HELD IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE OR IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 6–205(G) OF THIS TITLE.
(H) THE SECRETARY OF STATE, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL, THE COMPTROLLER, AND THE DIRECTOR, SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS
TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION, INCLUDING:
(1) PROCEDURES FOR PENALTY AVOIDANCE UNDER SUBSECTION
(D)(3) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) CRITERIA TO BE USED IN DETERMINING THE AMOUNT OF ANY
CIVIL PENALTIES ASSESSED UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION.
(I) ENFORCEMENT ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION DOES NOT PRECLUDE
ENFORCEMENT ACTION UNDER TITLE 6.5 OF THIS ARTICLE BY THE SECRETARY OF
STATE OR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.

HOUSE BILL 514
6.5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) (1) “Charitable purpose” means the relief of poverty, the advancement of
education or religion, the promotion of health, the promotion of a governmental purpose, or
any other purpose whose achievement is beneficial to the community.
(2) “CHARITABLE PURPOSE” DOES NOT INCLUDE PARTICIPATING IN
OR INTERVENING IN A POLITICAL CAMPAIGN, INCLUDING THE PUBLISHING OR
DISTRIBUTING OF STATEMENTS, ON BEHALF OF OR IN OPPOSITION TO A CANDIDATE
FOR PUBLIC OFFICE IN THE SAME MANNER AS § 501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL
REVENUE CODE WAS INTERPRETED AND APPLIED BY THE INTERNAL REVENUE
SERVICE AS OF JANUARY 19, 2025, WITH RESPECT TO PROHIBITING POLITICAL
CAMPAIGN ACTIVITY.
6.5–103.
(c) The remedies under this section are in addition to and do not limit the powers
and duties of the Secretary of State and the Attorney General under § 6–205 OR § 6–623
of this article or § 6.5–102 of this title.
Article – Tax – General
10–104.
(A) The income tax does not apply to the income of:
(1) a common trust fund, as defined in § 3–501(b) of the Financial
Institutions Article;
(2) except as provided in SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION AND §§
10–101(e)(3) of this subtitle and 10–304(2) of this title, an organization that is exempt from
taxation under § 408(e)(1) or § 501 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(3) a financial institution that is subject to the financial institution
franchise tax;
(4) a person subject to taxation under Title 6 of the Insurance Article;
(5) except as provided in § 10–102.1 of this subtitle, a partnership, as
defined in § 761 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(6) except as provided in § 10–102.1 of this subtitle and § 10–304(3) of this
title, an S corporation;

HOUSE BILL 514 11
(7) except as provided in § 10–304(4) of this title, an investment conduit or
a special exempt entity; or
(8) except as provided in § 10–102.1 of this subtitle, a limited liability
company as defined under Title 4A of the Corporations and Associations Article to the
extent that the company is taxable as a partnership, as defined in § 761 of the Internal
Revenue Code.
(B) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 6–101 OF THE BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE.
(2) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A CHARITABLE
ORGANIZATION THAT IS SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 6–623 OF THE
BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE.
(3) (I) THE EXEMPTION PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF
THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION THAT IS EXEMPT
FROM TAXATION UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE IF THE
CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION PARTICIPATES IN OR INTERVENES IN, INCLUDING
THROUGH PUBLICATION OR DISTRIBUTION OF STATEMENTS, A POLITICAL
CAMPAIGN ON BEHALF OF OR IN OPPOSITION TO A CANDIDATE FOR PUBLIC OFFICE.
(II) SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE
INTERPRETED AND APPLIED IN THE SAME MANNER AS THE PROHIBITION ON
POLITICAL CAMPAIGN ACTIVITY UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE
CODE WAS INTERPRETED AND APPLIED BY THE INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE AS OF
JANUARY 19, 2025.
(4) IF A REVOCATION OF A CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION’S
TAX–EXEMPT STATUS IS ORDERED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 6–623(F) OF THE
BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE, THE CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION DOES NOT
QUALIFY FOR THE EXEMPTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS SECTION UNTIL
THE TIME OF THE REVOCATION ELAPSES AS REQUIRED.
(5) PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES BEGINNING WITH
THE TAXABLE YEAR THAT THE REVOCATION OF A CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION’S
TAX–EXEMPT STATUS IS ORDERED UNDER § 6–623(F) OF THE BUSINESS
REGULATION ARTICLE.
11–204.
(a) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, THE
sales and use tax does not apply to:

HOUSE BILL 514
(1) a sale to a cemetery company, as described in § 501(c)(13) of the Internal
Revenue Code in effect on July 1, 1987;
(2) a sale to a credit union organized under the laws of the State or of the
United States;
(3) a sale to a nonprofit organization made to carry on its work, if the
organization:
(i) 1. is located in the State;
2. is located in an adjacent jurisdiction and provides its
services within the State on a routine and regular basis; or
3. is located in an adjacent jurisdiction whose law:
A. does not impose a sales or use tax on a sale to a nonprofit
organization made to carry on its work; or
B. contains a reciprocal exemption from sales and use tax for
sales to nonprofit organizations located in adjacent jurisdictions similar to the exemption
allowed under this subsection;
(ii) is a charitable, educational, or religious organization;
(iii) is not the United States; and
(iv) except for the American National Red Cross, is not a unit or
instrumentality of the United States;
(4) a sale, not exceeding $500, to a nonprofit incorporated senior citizens’
organization made to carry on its work, if the organization:
(i) is located in the State; and
(ii) receives funding from the State or a political subdivision of the
State;
(5) a sale to a volunteer fire company or department or volunteer
ambulance company or rescue squad located in the State made to carry on the work of the
company, department, or squad;
(6) a sale of tangible personal property, a digital code, or a digital product
to a nonprofit parent–teacher association located in the State if the association makes the
purchase to contribute the property to a school to which a sale is exempt under item (3) of
this subsection or § 11–220 of this subtitle;

HOUSE BILL 514 13
(7) a sale to a nonprofit organization made to carry on its work, if the
organization:
(i) is qualified as tax exempt under § 501(c)(4) of the Internal
Revenue Code; and
(ii) is engaged primarily in providing a program to render its best
efforts to contain, clean up, and otherwise mitigate spills of oil or other substances occurring
in United States coastal and tidal waters; or
(8) a sale to a bona fide nationally organized and recognized organization
of veterans of the armed forces of the United States or an auxiliary of the organization or
one of its units, if the organization is qualified as tax exempt under § 501(c)(4) or §
501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(b) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, THE
sales and use tax does not apply to a sale by:
(1) a bona fide church or religious organization, if the sale is made for the
general purposes of the church or organization;
(2) a gift shop at a mental hospital that the Maryland Department of
Health operates;
(3) a hospital thrift shop that:
(i) is operated by all volunteer staff;
(ii) sells only donated articles;
(iii) contributes the profits from sales to the hospital with which the
shop is associated; and
(iv) is not operated in conjunction with a gift shop or another retail
establishment;
(4) a vending facility operated under the Maryland Vending Program for
the Blind if:
(i) the facility is located on property held or acquired by or for the
use of the United States for any military or naval purpose; and
(ii) a post exchange or other tax–exempt concession is located and
operated on the same property;

HOUSE BILL 514
(5) an elementary or secondary school in the State or a nonprofit
parent–teacher organization or other nonprofit organization within an elementary or
secondary school in the State for the sale of magazine subscriptions in a fund–raising
campaign, if the net proceeds are used solely for the educational benefit of the school or its
students, including a sale resulting from an agreement or contract with an organization to
participate in a fund–raising campaign for a percentage of the gross receipts under which
students act as agents or salespersons for the organization by selling or taking orders for
the sale;
(6) a parent–teacher organization or other organization within an
elementary or secondary school in the State or within a school system in the State;
(7) subject to subsection (e) of this section, a bona fide church, religious
organization, or other nonprofit organization exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code if:
(i) the sale is made at an auction sale; and
(ii) the proceeds of the sale are used to carry on the exempt purposes
of the church or organization; or
(8) a nonprofit organization exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code that maintains a memorial on property that is owned by the State
if the proceeds of the sale are used to maintain a memorial on property that is owned by
the State.
(c) To qualify as an organization to which a sale is exempt under subsection (a)(3)
or (5) of this section, the organization shall file an application for an exemption certificate
with the Comptroller.
(d) The Comptroller may treat the possession of an effective determination letter
of status under § 501(c)(3) or (13) of the Internal Revenue Code from the Internal Revenue
Service as evidence that an organization qualifies under subsection (a)(3) or (5) or (1) of this
section, respectively.
(e) For a sale described under subsection (b)(7) of this section that is not otherwise
exempt under this section, only that part of the sale price that qualifies for a deduction
under the federal income tax as a charitable contribution under the regulations and
guidelines of the Internal Revenue Service is exempt from the sales and use tax under this
section.
(F) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 6–101 OF THE BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 514 15
(2) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A CHARITABLE
ORGANIZATION THAT IS SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 6–623 OF THE
BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE.
(3) (I) THE EXEMPTION PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION DOES
NOT APPLY TO A CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION THAT IS EXEMPT FROM TAXATION
UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE IF THE CHARITABLE
ORGANIZATION PARTICIPATES IN OR INTERVENES IN A POLITICAL CAMPAIGN ON
BEHALF OF OR IN OPPOSITION TO A CANDIDATE FOR PUBLIC OFFICE, INCLUDING
THROUGH PUBLICATION OR DISTRIBUTION OF STATEMENTS.
(II) SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE
INTERPRETED AND APPLIED IN THE SAME MANNER AS THE PROHIBITION ON
POLITICAL CAMPAIGN ACTIVITY UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE
CODE WAS INTERPRETED AND APPLIED BY THE INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE AS OF
JANUARY 19, 2025.
(4) IF A REVOCATION OF A CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION’S
TAX–EXEMPT STATUS IS ORDERED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 6–623(F) OF THE
BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE, THE CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION DOES NOT
QUALIFY FOR AN EXEMPTION UNDER THIS SECTION UNTIL THE TIME OF THE
REVOCATION ELAPSES AS REQUIRED.
Article – Tax – Property
7–202.
(a) In this section:
(1) “fraternal organization” means any organization that:
(i) is conducted solely for the benefit of its members and its
beneficiaries;
(ii) is operated on a lodge system with a ritualistic activity; and
(iii) has a representative form of government;
(2) “fraternal organization” includes a sororal organization; and
(3) “fraternal organization” does not include:
(i) any college or high school fraternity or sorority; or

HOUSE BILL 514
(ii) any other fraternal or sororal organization the membership of
which is restricted wholly or largely to students or graduates of an educational institution
or a professional school.
(b) (1) Except as provided in [subsection] SUBSECTIONS (c) AND (E) of this
section and § 6–302(d) of this article and subject to §
7–204.1 of this subtitle, property is not subject to property tax if the property:
(i) is necessary for and actually used exclusively for a charitable or
educational purpose to promote the general welfare of the people of the State, including an
activity or an athletic program of an educational institution; and
(ii) is owned by:
1. a nonprofit hospital;
2. a nonprofit charitable, fraternal, educational, or literary
organization including:
A. a public library that is authorized under Title 23 of the
Education Article; and
B. a men’s or women’s club that is a nonpolitical and nonstock
club;
3. a corporation, limited liability company, or trustee that
holds the property for the sole benefit of an organization that qualifies for an exemption
under this section; or
4. a nonprofit housing corporation.
(2) The exemption under paragraph (1)(ii)1 of this subsection includes any
personal property initially leased by a nonprofit hospital for more than 1 year under a lease
that is noncancellable except for cause.
(c) (1) This subsection does not apply to real property owned by a nonprofit
charitable museum that:
(i) is open to the public; and
(ii) does not charge an admission fee.
(2) Except for a nonprofit hospital, not more than 100 acres of real property
owned by an exempt organization and appurtenant to the premises of the exempt
organization is exempt from property tax, if the property is located outside of a municipal
corporation or Baltimore City.

HOUSE BILL 514 17
(3) Not more than 100 acres of real property of a nonprofit hospital that is
appurtenant to the hospital is exempt from property tax.
(d) (1) Notwithstanding § 7–104 of this title and after filing the application
provided by § 7–103 of this title, property tax on any property that is transferred to a
nonprofit charitable organization is abated from the date during the taxable year when the
instrument transferring title to the organization is recorded if:
(i) the property is transferred to a nonprofit charitable organization
qualified under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(ii) the property becomes exempt under this section;
(iii) the property has a value less than $300,000 as listed in the
records of the Department on the date when the instrument transferring title to the
organization is recorded; and
(iv) the nonprofit charitable organization provides the Department
evidence of the property tax it actually paid or reimbursed at the property settlement.
(2) The amount of property tax abated under this subsection may not
exceed the amount of property tax actually paid or reimbursed by an eligible organization
at the property settlement.
(E) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 6–101 OF THE BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE.
(2) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A CHARITABLE
ORGANIZATION THAT IS SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 6–623 OF THE
BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE.
(3) (I) THE EXEMPTION PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION DOES
NOT APPLY TO A CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION THAT IS EXEMPT FROM TAXATION
UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE IF THE CHARITABLE
ORGANIZATION PARTICIPATES IN OR INTERVENES IN, INCLUDING THROUGH
PUBLICATION OR DISTRIBUTION OF STATEMENTS, A POLITICAL CAMPAIGN ON
BEHALF OF OR IN OPPOSITION TO A CANDIDATE FOR PUBLIC OFFICE.
(II) SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE
INTERPRETED AND APPLIED IN THE SAME MANNER AS THE PROHIBITION ON
POLITICAL CAMPAIGN ACTIVITY UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE
CODE WAS INTERPRETED AND APPLIED BY THE INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE AS OF
JANUARY 19, 2025.

HOUSE BILL 514
(4) IF A REVOCATION OF A CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION’S
TAX–EXEMPT STATUS IS ORDERED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 6–623(F) OF THE
BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE, THE CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION DOES NOT
QUALIFY FOR THE PROPERTY TAX EXEMPTION UNDER THIS SECTION UNTIL THE
TIME OF THE REVOCATION ELAPSES AS REQUIRED.
(5) PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES BEGINNING WITH
THE TAXABLE YEAR THAT THE REVOCATION OF A CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION’S
TAX–EXEMPT STATUS IS ORDERED UNDER § 6–623(F) OF THE BUSINESS
REGULATION ARTICLE.
7–204.
(A) Except as provided in § 6–302(d) of this article and subject to § 7–204.1 of this
subtitle AND EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, property
that is owned by a religious group or organization is not subject to property tax if the
property is actually used exclusively for:
(1) public religious worship;
(2) a parsonage or convent; or
(3) educational purposes.
(B) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 6–101 OF THE BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE.
(2) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A CHARITABLE
ORGANIZATION THAT IS SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 6–623 OF THE
BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE.
(3) (I) THE EXEMPTION PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION DOES
NOT APPLY TO A CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION THAT IS EXEMPT FROM TAXATION
UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE IF THE CHARITABLE
ORGANIZATION PARTICIPATES IN OR INTERVENES IN A POLITICAL CAMPAIGN ON
BEHALF OF OR IN OPPOSITION TO A CANDIDATE FOR PUBLIC OFFICE, INCLUDING
THROUGH PUBLICATION OR DISTRIBUTION OF STATEMENTS.
(II) SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE
INTERPRETED IN THE SAME MANNER AS THE PROHIBITION ON POLITICAL
CAMPAIGN ACTIVITY UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE WAS
INTERPRETED AND APPLIED BY THE INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE AS OF JANUARY
19, 2025.

HOUSE BILL 514 19
(4) IF A REVOCATION OF A CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION’S
TAX–EXEMPT STATUS IS ORDERED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 6–623(F) OF THE
BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE, THE CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION DOES NOT
QUALIFY FOR THE PROPERTY TAX EXEMPTION UNDER THIS SECTION UNTIL THE
TIME OF THE REVOCATION ELAPSES AS REQUIRED.
(5) PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES BEGINNING WITH
THE TAXABLE YEAR THAT THE REVOCATION OF A CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION’S
TAX–EXEMPT STATUS IS ORDERED UNDER § 6–623(F) OF THE BUSINESS
REGULATION ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) In this section, “Johnson Amendment” means the provision contained in §
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that prohibits a federally tax–exempt entity from
participating in or intervening in any political campaign on behalf of or in opposition to a
candidate for public office, including through publication or distribution of statements, as
that provision was interpreted and applied by the Internal Revenue Service as of January
19, 2025.
(b) Section 1 of this Act is contingent on any action by the President of the United
States or the Internal Revenue Service or change in federal law that, in whole or in part,
prevents the enforcement of, or renders null and void, the Johnson Amendment with
respect to any charitable organization to which the provisions of § 6–623 of the Business
Regulation Article apply.
(c) (1) The Attorney General shall monitor action by the federal government
to determine whether any action or change occurs as described under subsection (b) of this
section.
(2) If the Attorney General determines an action or change occurs as
described under subsection (b) of this section, the Attorney General shall notify the
Department of Legislative Services within 5 days after the determination is made.
(d) If the Department of Legislative Services receives notice from the Attorney
General as described under subsection (c)(2) of this section, Section 1 of this Act shall take
effect on the date the notice is received by the Department of Legislative Services.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 2 of this
Act, this Act is an emergency measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public health or safety, has been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of
all the members elected to each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take
effect from the date it is enacted.